test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VII_VV_CNJ_mchaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - VV - mchaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     prt     dub
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 260)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: mchaag
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+4: mchaanig

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg: mchaagba
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+4: mchaan'giba #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg: mechaagwenh #changed conjunct...
     PV/CCNJ+mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4: mechaan'gwenh #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0Sg: mchaagbane
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+4: mchaan'gobne #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg: mchaasnog 
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+4: mchaasnoonig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg: mchaasnoogba
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+4: mchaasnoon'giba #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg: mechaasnoogwenh #changed conjunct
     PV/CCNJ+mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+4: mechaasnoon'gwenh #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0Sg: mchaasnoogbane 
     mchaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+4: mchaasnoon'gobne #'
